tests/verbs.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../ibo.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../ibo.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "iri":
    iri<v><tv><inf>: iri
    iri<v><tv><pres>: ri
    iri<v><tv><past>: riri
    iri<v><tv><cont>: na-eri
    iri<v><tv><fut>: ga-eri
  
  "ibi":
    ibi<v><iv><inf>: ibi
    ibi<v><iv><pres>: bi
    ibi<v><iv><past>: bibi
    ibi<v><iv><cont>: na-ebi
    ibi<v><iv><fut>: ga-ebi
  
  "ịga":
    ịga<v><iv><inf>: ịga
    ịga<v><iv><pres>: ga
    ịga<v><iv><past>: gara
    ịga<v><iv><cont>: na-aga
    ịga<v><iv><fut>: ga-aga

  "ịza":
    ịza<v><tv><inf>: ịza
    ịza<v><tv><pres>: za
    ịza<v><tv><past>: zara
    ịza<v><tv><cont>: na-aza
    ịza<v><tv><fut>: ga-aza

  "ịbụ":
    ịbụ<v><iv><inf>: ịbụ
    ịbụ<v><iv><sg><p1><pres>: m
    ịbụ<v><iv><sg><p2><pres>: bụ
    ịbụ<v><iv><sg><p3><pres>: di
    ịbụ<v><iv><pl><pres>: bụ
    ịbụ<v><iv><past>: nọ
    ịbụ<v><iv><fut>: ga-nọ
  
  "ịchọta":
    ịchọta<v><tv><inf>: ịchọta
    ịchọta<v><tv><pres>: chọta
    ịchọta<v><tv><past>: chọtara
    ịchọta<v><tv><cont>: na-achọta
    ịchọta<v><tv><fut>: ga-achọta
    
  "inwe":
    inwe<v><tv><inf>: inwe
    inwe<v><tv><pres>: nwe
    inwe<v><tv><past>: nwere
    inwe<v><tv><cont>: na-enwe
    inwe<v><tv><fut>: ga-enwe
  
  "ime":
    ime<v><tv><inf>: ime
    ime<v><tv><pres>: me
    ime<v><tv><past>: mere
    ime<v><tv><cont>: na-eme
    ime<v><tv><fut>: ga-eme

  "ikwu":
    ikwu<v><tv><inf>: ikwu
    ikwu<v><tv><pres>: kwu
    ikwu<v><tv><past>: kwuru
    ikwu<v><tv><cont>: na-ekwu
    ikwu<v><tv><fut>: ga-ekwu  
    
  "ije":
    ije<v><iv><inf>: ije
    ije<v><iv><pres>: je
    ije<v><iv><past>: jere
    ije<v><iv><cont>: na-eje
    ije<v><iv><fut>: ga-eje 
    
  "ịma":
    ịma<v><tv><inf>: ịma
    ịma<v><tv><pres>: ma
    ịma<v><tv><past>: mara
    ịma<v><tv><cont>: na-ama
    ịma<v><tv><fut>: ga-ama 
    
  "ịhụ":
    ịhụ<v><tv><inf>: ịhụ
    ịhụ<v><tv><pres>: hụ
    ịhụ<v><tv><past>: hụrụ
    ịhụ<v><tv><cont>: na-ahụ
    ịhụ<v><tv><fut>: ga-ahụ
      
  "ịbịa":
    ịbịa<v><tv><inf>: ịbịa
    ịbịa<v><tv><pres>: bịa
    ịbịa<v><tv><past>: bịara
    ịbịa<v><tv><cont>: na-abịa
    ịbịa<v><tv><fut>: ga-abịa  
      
  "iche":
    iche<v><tv><inf>: iche
    iche<v><tv><pres>: chee
    iche<v><tv><past>: chere
    iche<v><tv><cont>: na-eche
    iche<v><tv><fut>: ga-eche
      
  "ine":
    ine<v><tv><inf>: ine
    ine<v><tv><pres>: ne
    ine<v><tv><past>: nere
    ine<v><tv><cont>: na-ene
    ine<v><tv><fut>: ga-ene  
    
  "chọrọ":
    chọrọ<v><tv><inf>: chọrọ
    chọrọ<v><tv><pres>: chọrọ
    chọrọ<v><tv><past>: chọrọ
    chọrọ<v><tv><cont>: na-achọ
    chọrọ<v><tv><fut>: ga-achọ
      
  "inye":
    inye<v><tv><inf>: inye
    inye<v><tv><pres>: nye
    inye<v><tv><past>: nyere
    inye<v><tv><cont>: na-enye
    inye<v><tv><fut>: ga-enye

  "ịgwa":
    ịgwa<v><tv><inf>: ịgwa
    ịgwa<v><tv><pres>: gwa
    ịgwa<v><tv><past>: gwara
    ịgwa<v><tv><cont>: na-agwa
    ịgwa<v><tv><fut>: ga-agwa
      
  "ịjụ":
    ịjụ<v><tv><inf>: ịjụ
    ịjụ<v><tv><pres>: jụ
    ịjụ<v><tv><past>: jụrụ
    ịjụ<v><tv><cont>: na-ajụ
    ịjụ<v><tv><fut>: ga-ajụ
      
  "irụ":
    ịrụ<v><tv><inf>: ịrụ
    ịrụ<v><tv><pres>: rụ
    ịrụ<v><tv><past>: rụrụ
    ịrụ<v><tv><cont>: na-arụ
    ịrụ<v><tv><fut>: ga-arụ
      
  "ịhapụ":
    ịhapụ<v><iv><inf>: ịhapụ
    ịhapụ<v><iv><pres>: hapụ
    ịhapụ<v><iv><past>: hapụrụ
    ịhapụ<v><iv><cont>: na-ahapụ
    ịhapụ<v><iv><fut>: ga-ahapụ
      
  "ịkpọ":
    ịkpọ<v><tv><inf>: ịkpọ
    ịkpọ<v><tv><pres>: kpọ
    ịkpọ<v><tv><past>: kpọrọ
    ịkpọ<v><tv><cont>: na-akpọ
    ịkpọ<v><tv><fut>: ga-akpọ
      
  "ịchụ":
    ịchụ<v><tv><inf>: ịchụ
    ịchụ<v><tv><pres>: chụ
    ịchụ<v><tv><past>: chụrụ
    ịchụ<v><tv><cont>: na-achụ
    ịchụ<v><tv><fut>: ga-achụ
      
  "ide":
    ide<v><tv><inf>: ide
    ide<v><tv><pres>: de
    ide<v><tv><past>: dere
    ide<v><tv><cont>: na-ede
    ide<v><tv><fut>: ga-ede
      
  "ịgafe":
    ịgafe<v><iv><inf>: ịgafe
    ịgafe<v><iv><pres>: gafe
    ịgafe<v><iv><past>: gafere
    ịgafe<v><iv><cont>: na-agafe
    ịgafe<v><iv><fut>: ga-agafe
      
  "ịgba":
    ịgba<v><iv><inf>: ịgba
    ịgba<v><iv><pres>: gba
    ịgba<v><iv><past>: gbara
    ịgba<v><iv><cont>: na-agba
    ịgba<v><iv><fut>: ga-agba

  "igbachi":
    igbachi<v><tv><inf>: igbachi
    igbachi<v><tv><pres>: gbachi
    igbachi<v><tv><past>: gbachiri
    igbachi<v><tv><cont>: na-agbachi
    igbachi<v><tv><fut>: ga-gabachi
      
  "icheta":
    icheta<v><tv><inf>: icheta
    icheta<v><tv><pres>: cheta
    icheta<v><tv><past>: chetara
    icheta<v><tv><cont>: na-cheta
    icheta<v><tv><fut>: ga-cheta
    
  "ịkagbu":
    ịkagbu<v><tv><inf>: ịkagbu
    ịkagbu<v><tv><pres>: kagbu
    ịkagbu<v><tv><past>: kagburu
    ịkagbu<v><tv><cont>: na-akagbu
    ịkagbu<v><tv><fut>: ga-akagbu            
      
  "ịnọdụ":
    ịnọdụ<v><tv><inf>: ịnọdụ
    ịnọdụ<v><tv><pres>: nọdụ
    ịnọdụ<v><tv><past>: nọdụrụ
    ịnọdụ<v><tv><cont>: na-anọdụ
    ịnọdụ<v><tv><fut>: ga-anọdụ  

  "itu":
    itu<v><tv><inf>: itu
    itu<v><tv><pres>: tu
    itu<v><tv><past>: turu
    itu<v><tv><cont>: na-atu
    itu<v><tv><fut>: ga-atu    
    
  "ịmalite":
    ịmalite<v><tv><inf>: ịmalite
    ịmalite<v><tv><pres>: malite
    ịmalite<v><tv><past>: malitere
    ịmalite<v><tv><cont>: na-amalite
    ịmalite<v><tv><fut>: ga-amalite  
  
  "ịnụọ":
    ịnụọ<v><tv><inf>: ịnụọ
    ịnụọ<v><tv><pres>: nụọ
    ịnụọ<v><tv><past>: nụọrụ
    ịnụọ<v><tv><cont>: na-anụọ
    ịnụọ<v><tv><fut>: ga-anụọ  
  
  "ịzaghachi":
    ịzaghachi<v><tv><inf>: ịzaghachi
    ịzaghachi<v><tv><pres>: zaghachi
    ịzaghachi<v><tv><past>: zaghachiri
    ịzaghachi<v><tv><cont>: na-azaghachi
    ịzaghachi<v><tv><fut>: ga-azaghachi    

  "inweta":
    inweta<v><tv><inf>: inweta
    inweta<v><tv><pres>: nweta
    inweta<v><tv><past>: nwetara
    inweta<v><tv><cont>: na-enweta
    inweta<v><tv><fut>: ga-enweta

  "ịnụ":
    ịnụ<v><tv><inf>: ịnụ
    ịnụ<v><tv><pres>: nụ
    ịnụ<v><tv><past>: nụrụ
    ịnụ<v><tv><cont>: na-anụ
    ịnụ<v><tv><fut>: ga-anụ  
      
  "chị ọchị":
    "ịchị ọchị<v><tv><inf>": "ịchị ọchị"
    "ịchị ọchị<v><tv><pres>": "chịa ọchị"
    "ịchị ọchị<v><tv><past>": "chịrị ọchị"
    "ịchị ọchị<v><tv><cont>": "na-achị ọchị" 
    "ịchị ọchị<v><tv><fut>": "ga-achị ọchị" 
    
  "ịge ntị":
    "ịge ntị<v><tv><inf>": "ịge ntị"
    "ịge ntị<v><tv><pres>": "ge ntị"
    "ịge ntị<v><tv><past>": "gere ntị"
    "ịge ntị<v><tv><cont>": "na-ege ntị"
    "ịge ntị<v><tv><fut>": "ga-ege ntị"    
   
  "igwu egwu":
    "igwu egwu<v><iv><inf>": "igwu egwu"
    "igwu egwu<v><iv><pres>": "gwu egwu"
    "igwu egwu<v><iv><past>": "gwuru egwu"
    "igwu egwu<v><iv><cont>": "na-egwu egwu"
    "igwu egwu<v><iv><fut>": "ga-egwu egwu"  
      
  "igba oso":
    "igba oso<v><iv><inf>": "igba oso"
    "igba oso<v><iv><pres>": "gba oso"
    "igba oso<v><iv><past>": "gbara oso"
    "igba oso<v><iv><cont>": "na-agba oso"
    "igba oso<v><iv><fut>": "ga-agba oso"    
     
  "izo ezo":
    "izo ezo<v><tv><inf>": "izo ezo"
    "izo ezo<v><tv><pres>": "izo ezo"
    "izo ezo<v><tv><past>": "izo ezo"
    "izo ezo<v><tv><cont>": "na-izo ezo"
    "izo ezo<v><tv><fut>": "ga-izo ezo"    
    
  "ikwu okwu":
    "ikwu okwu<v><tv><inf>": "ikwu okwu"
    "ikwu okwu<v><tv><pres>": "kwu okwu"
    "ikwu okwu<v><tv><past>": "kwuru okwu"
    "ikwu okwu<v><tv><cont>": "na-ekwu okwu"
    "ikwu okwu<v><tv><fut>": "ga-ekwu okwu"  

  "ịhụnanya":
    "ịhụnanya<v><tv><inf>": "ịhụnanya"
    "ịhụnanya<v><tv><pres>": "hụnanya"
    "ịhụnanya<v><tv><past>": "hụrụ n'anya"
    "ịhụnanya<v><tv><cont>": "na-ahụ n'anya"
    "ịhụnanya<v><tv><fut>": "ga-ahụ n'anya" 
    
    
    
  "iweta":
    iweta<v><tv><inf>: iweta
    iweta<v><tv><pres>: weta
    iweta<v><tv><past>: wetara
    iweta<v><tv><cont>: na-eweta
    iweta<v><tv><fut>: ga-eweta
    
  "ise":
    ise<v><tv><inf>: ise
    ise<v><tv><pres>: se
    ise<v><tv><past>: sere
    ise<v><tv><cont>: na-ese
    ise<v><tv><fut>: ga-ese    
    
  "ijide":
    ijide<v><tv><inf>: ijide
    ijide<v><tv><pres>: jide
    ijide<v><tv><past>: jidere
    ijide<v><tv><cont>: na-ejide
    ijide<v><tv><fut>: ga-ejide
    
  "ikpee ekpere":
    "ikpee ekpere<v><tv><inf>": "ikpee ekpere"
    "ikpee ekpere<v><tv><pres>": "kpee ekpere"
    "ikpee ekpere<v><tv><past>": "kpere ekpere"
    "ikpee ekpere<v><tv><cont>": "na-ekpe ekpere"
    "ikpee ekpere<v><tv><fut>": "ga-ekpe ekpere"    
        
  "ibu abụ":
    "ibu abụ<v><tv><inf>": "ibu abụ"
    "ibu abụ<v><tv><pres>": "bu abụ"
    "ibu abụ<v><tv><past>": "buru abụ"
    "ibu abụ<v><tv><cont>": "na-abu abụ"
    "ibu abụ<v><tv><fut>": "ga-abu abụ "    
    
  "ihi ụra":
    "ihi ụra<v><tv><inf>": "ihi ụra"
    "ihi ụra<v><tv><pres>": "hie ụra "
    "ihi ụra<v><tv><past>": "hiri ụra"
    "ihi ụra<v><tv><cont>": "na-ehi ụra"
    "ihi ụra<v><tv><fut>": "ga-ehi ụra"  
    
  "iguzo":
    iguzo<v><tv><inf>: iguzo
    iguzo<v><tv><pres>: guzo
    iguzo<v><tv><past>: guzoro
    iguzo<v><tv><cont>: na-eguzo
    iguzo<v><tv><fut>: ga-eguzo   
    
  "iwere":
    iwere<v><tv><inf>: iwere
    iwere<v><tv><pres>: were
    iwere<v><tv><past>: were
    iwere<v><tv><cont>: na-ewere
    iwere<v><tv><fut>: ga-ewere      
        
  "ide":
    ide<v><tv><inf>: ide
    ide<v><tv><pres>: dee
    ide<v><tv><past>: dere
    ide<v><tv><cont>: na-ede
    ide<v><tv><fut>: ga-ede    
          
  "isi":
    isi<v><tv><inf>: isi
    isi<v><tv><pres>: si
    isi<v><tv><past>: siri
    isi<v><tv><cont>: na-asi
    isi<v><tv><fut>: ga-asi    
                  
  "ima":
    ima<v><tv><inf>: ima
    ima<v><tv><pres>: ma
    ima<v><tv><past>: mara
    ima<v><tv><cont>: na-ama
    ima<v><tv><fut>: ga-ama         
                  
  "ifu":
    ifu<v><tv><inf>: ifu
    ifu<v><tv><pres>: fu
    ifu<v><tv><past>: furu
    ifu<v><tv><cont>: na-afu
    ifu<v><tv><fut>: ga-afu     
                   
  "ibia":
    ibia<v><tv><inf>: ibia
    ibia<v><tv><pres>: bia
    ibia<v><tv><past>: biara
    ibia<v><tv><cont>: na-abia
    ibia<v><tv><fut>: ga-abia     
                
  "igwa":
    igwa<v><tv><inf>: igwa
    igwa<v><tv><pres>: gwa
    igwa<v><tv><past>: gwara
    igwa<v><tv><cont>: na-agwa
    igwa<v><tv><fut>: ga-agwa              
                                
  "iwu":
    iwu<v><tv><inf>: iwu
    iwu<v><tv><pres>: wu
    iwu<v><tv><past>: wuru
    iwu<v><tv><cont>: na-awu
    iwu<v><tv><fut>: ga-awu              
                            
  "ịdị adị":
    "ịdị adị<v><tv><inf>": "ịdị adị"
    "ịdị adị<v><tv><pres>": "dị adị"
    "ịdị adị<v><tv><past>": "dịrị adị"
    "ịdị adị<v><tv><cont>": "na-adị adị"
    "ịdị adị<v><tv><fut>": "ga-adị adị"               
               
  "ịkpọ":
    ịkpọ<v><tv><inf>: ịkpọ
    ịkpọ<v><tv><pres>: kpọ
    ịkpọ<v><tv><past>: kpọrọ
    ịkpọ<v><tv><cont>: na-akpọ
    ịkpọ<v><tv><fut>: ga-akpọ                 
               
  "ịjụ":
    ịjụ<v><tv><inf>: ịjụ
    ịjụ<v><tv><pres>: jụọ
    ịjụ<v><tv><past>: jụrụ
    ịjụ<v><tv><cont>: na-ajụ
    ịjụ<v><tv><fut>: ga-ajụ                
    
  "iji":
    iji<v><tv><inf>: iji
    iji<v><tv><pres>: jiri
    iji<v><tv><past>: eji
    iji<v><tv><cont>: na-eji
    iji<v><tv><fut>: ga-eji    
    
  "ibido":
    ibido<v><tv><inf>: ibido
    ibido<v><tv><pres>: bido
    ibido<v><tv><past>: bidoro
    ibido<v><tv><cont>: na-ebido
    ibido<v><tv><fut>: ga-ebido    
        
  "ịchọ":
    ịchọ<v><tv><inf>: ịchọ
    ịchọ<v><tv><pres>: chọọ
    ịchọ<v><tv><past>: chọrọ
    ịchọ<v><tv><cont>: na-achọ
    ịchọ<v><tv><fut>: ga-achọ  
           
    
